Wyoming, session 2025, HB0253.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 29-2-112(a)(ii)(B) and (iii) is
amended to read:

29-2-112. Preliminary notices.

(a) With respect to perfecting the right to file a
construction lien under this chapter, the following
preliminary notice requirements shall apply:
HB0253

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0736

(ii) Any notice required under this section
shall be sent:

(B) By the subcontractor or materialman
within thirty (30) days after first providing services or
materials to the construction project before final payment
by the owner to the general contractor.

(iii) Except as otherwise provided in this
paragraph, failure to send the notice required under this
section within the time specified shall bar the right of a
contractor, subcontractor or materialman to assert a lien.
A subcontractor or materialman shall not be barred from
asserting a lien under this paragraph if the contractor
failed to provide the information required under W.S.
29-2-113 to the subcontractor or materialman;

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0253